parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-firstnames.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8 é à ñ
!# CONTENT:     first names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop 
+Firstname

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abrev


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
Adriana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Agnes+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alba+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Alexandra+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Alice+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Alina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amanda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Amparo+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Anabel+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Andrea+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Ángeles+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Angelines+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Anna+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Annie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Antonietta+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Arancha+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ariadna+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Astrid+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Aurelia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Balbina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Basilisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Begoña+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Belinda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Betty+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Blanca+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Candelaria+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Candy+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Carla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Carme+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Carmen+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Carolina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Carolyn+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Catherine+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Celia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Charlotte+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Chenoa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Christine+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Clara+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Claude+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Claudia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Concepción+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Conchita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Covadonga+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Cruz+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Daniela+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Danila+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Diana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Dinora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Domitila+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Dora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Dorothea+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Edith+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Efigenia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Elisa+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Elke+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Emeranciana+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Eneko+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ermesenda+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Esperanza+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Eurídice+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Evelina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fátima+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Fernanda+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Francisca+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Genoveva+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Gisele+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Guisla+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Helena+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Herminia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Hildegarda+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Hipolita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Hoover+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ingrid+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Isabel+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Isidora+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Jane+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Joaquina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Juanito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Juanita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Juliana+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Kate+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Kim+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Laure+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Leonor+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Liberata+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ligia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lola+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lucia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Lucy+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Luz+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Macarena+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Malú+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Margaret+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
María+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
María% del% Carmen+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Marie+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marietta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Marisol+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Martina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Melania+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mercedes+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Mingote+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mireia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Mirta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Muriel+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Naia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Natalia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Nicole+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Nuria+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Olga+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Paola+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Patricia+Prop+Firstname		FSG;	!@
Pere+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Perseveranda+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Rafa+Prop+Firstname		XSG;
Rafaela+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Regina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Reyes+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Roberta+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rosalía+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rosario+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Rupert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Sally+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Saturnina+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Shirley+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Simona+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Sohio+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Stella+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Swisair+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Tula+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Uxue+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Veneranda+Prop+Firstname	FSG;
Verónica+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Vilma+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Virtudes+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Zita+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Abdul-Jabbar+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Abilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Adalberto+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Adriano+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aíto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Albert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Alés+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Alexis+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Amadeus+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Anastasio+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Ángel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Anthony+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Apuleyo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aristide+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Aroun+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Asimakis+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ayesh+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Basilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Benito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Bernat+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Billy+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Borís+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Bryce+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Candelario+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Cecilio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Chamaco+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ciprián+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Clemente+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Crarles+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	
Dagoberto+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Daniil+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Demetrio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Dimitri+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Donald+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Dulce+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Edgar+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Eduardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Eleázar+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Elpidio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Eneas+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Erik+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ernst+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Euclides+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Evagrio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Expedito+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fede+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Fernando+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Flavio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Francisco% Javier+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Frederic+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Galaktión+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Gelasio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Georgios+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Geruncio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gildardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Glenn+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Gualberto+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Gumberto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hans+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Heinrich+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Herbert+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hermenegildo+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Herri+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hiscio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Hosni+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Ignacio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Íñigo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jacinto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jairo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jean+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Jerry+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Joan+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Johnny+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
José% Carlos+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
José% Ramón+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Juan% Carlos+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Julio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Ken+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Konstantínovich+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Lauro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Leonardo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Leopold+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lina+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Lisandro+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Lucas+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Luzbel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mahoma+Prop+Firstname		MSG;		!nombre de profeta
Marcelo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Massieu+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mathilde+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Maurice+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Máximo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Michel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Mikel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Moncho+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Napoleón+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!personaje historico
Nicanor+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Nigel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Novotel+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Oleg+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Orestes+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Osvaldo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Owen+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Pasok+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Pávlovich+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Philipp+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Polisario+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Ráfik+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rauf+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Renato+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Reyes% Magos+Prop+Firstname	MPL;	!personajes de cultura popular cristiana
Rigoletto+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Rodolfo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Romeo+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Rudy+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Salvador+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Sarvelio+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Serafín+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Serviodeo+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Sigiberto+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Sisebuto+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Stephen+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Tamara+Prop+Firstname		FSG;
Ted+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Thomas+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Tom+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Txiki+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Valentino+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Vasilios+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Vicente+Prop+Firstname		MSG;	!@
Víktor+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Vladimir+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Walter+Prop+Firstname		MSP;
Wenceslao+Prop+Firstname	MSG;
Wladimir+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Yago+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
Yefim+Prop+Firstname		MSG;
